Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 196 Corrections

196.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cabinet” means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Commissioner” means commissioner of the Department of Corrections;

“Department” means the Department of Corrections;

“Institution” means any institution under the control of the Department of Corrections; and

“Secretary” means secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

History.
Amend. Acts 1952, ch. 50, § 34; 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 187; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 18, effective July 14, 1992; 2003, ch. 71, § 9, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 221, effective June 26, 2007.